Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Article 1. Generally

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

81 Am. Jur. 2d Workmen's Compensation § 1 et seq.

Compensability of specially equipped van or vehicle under workers' compensation statutes, 63 ALR5th 163.

99 C.J.S. Workmen's Compensation § 1 et seq.

§ 27-14-101.
Short title; statement of intent.

This act may be cited as the “Wyoming Worker’s Compensation Act”.

It is the intent of the legislature in creating the Wyoming worker’s compensation division that the laws administered by it to provide a worker’s benefit system be interpreted to assure the quick and efficient delivery of indemnity and medical benefits to injured and disabled workers at a reasonable cost to the employers who are subject to the Worker’s Compensation Act. It is the specific intent of the legislature that benefit claims cases be decided on their merits and that the common law rule of “liberal construction” based on the supposed “remedial” basis of workers’ benefits legislation shall not apply in these cases. The worker’s benefit system in Wyoming is based on a mutual renunciation of common law rights and defenses by employers and employees alike. Accordingly, the legislature declares that the Worker’s Compensation Act is not remedial in any sense and is not to be given a broad liberal construction in favor of any party.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1994, ch. 86, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[T]his act,” referred to in this section, see § 27-14-102(a)(xxvii).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1996, ch. 82, § 4, effective January 1, 1997, provides: “Except as provided by W.S. 27-14-802(d) and (e) as amended under section 1 of this act, effective January 1, 1997, all duties and responsibilities of the clerks of district court under the Wyoming Worker's Compensation Act shall be transferred to the worker's compensation division within the department of employment. The division shall identify and notify the clerks of court of those active worker's compensation case files to be transferred to the division. All other worker's compensation case files shall be retained by the clerks of court in accordance with file retention policies in effect for other district court cases.”

Legislative intent. —

The clear language of the Worker's Compensation Act demonstrates that the act is to assure quick and efficient delivery of indemnity and medical benefits to injured and disabled workers at a reasonable cost to employers. Streeter v. Amerequip Corp., 968 F. Supp. 624, 1997 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 9464 (D. Wyo. 1997).

Contrary to the employee's assertion, there was nothing in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-14-101(b) indicating that the legislature intended that procedural deficiencies be overlooked simply because the claimant appeared to meet the definition of temporary total disability.
Bailey v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2010 WY 152, 243 P.3d 953,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 2010).

Worker's Compensation Act is legislative embodiment of compromise between employers and employees

who recognized the need for a new system to compensate employees for employment-related injuries. Mauch v. Stanley Structures, 641 P.2d 1247,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 309

(Wyo. 1982).

While the courts may no longer interpret worker's compensation statutes in favor of coverage, the supreme court will interpret them in a way that gives effect to the legislative intent and preserves the historic compromise between workers and employees. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. v. Summers (In re Summers), 987 P.2d 153,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 1999).

Liberal construction. —

The Workmen's (now Worker's) Compensation Act should be interpreted with reasonable liberality, that the benefits that were intended be accomplished. In re McConnell, 45 Wyo. 289, 18 P.2d 629,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1933); Wyoming State Treas. ex rel. Worker's Comp. Div. v. Barnes, 587 P.2d 214,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 247

(Wyo. 1978).

The Workmen's (now Worker's) Compensation Law of this state should be liberally and reasonably construed to protect persons suffering casualties in industry and to avoid incongruous results. In re Pope, 54 Wyo. 266, 91 P.2d 58,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1939); Fuhs v. Swenson, 58 Wyo. 293, 131 P.2d 333,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1942); Wright v. Wyoming State Training Sch., 71 Wyo. 173, 255 P.2d 211,

1953 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1953); Herring v. Welltech, Inc., 660 P.2d 361,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 293

(Wyo. 1983).

Workmen's (now worker's) compensation cases should be liberally construed so that where reasonably possible the industry and not the individual workman should, to a large extent, bear burdens of accidents suffered within it. Christensen v. Sikora, 57 Wyo. 57, 112 P.2d 557,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(1941); In re Gimlin, 403 P.2d 178,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 1965).

The language of this chapter should receive a liberal construction. Lichty v. Lichty Constr. Co., 69 Wyo. 411, 243 P.2d 151,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1952).

The Workmen's (now Worker's) Compensation Law should be liberally construed in favor of the workman. Claim of Carey, 74 Wyo. 37, 283 P.2d 1005,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1955).

The Worker's Compensation Law should be liberally construed where reasonably possible so that industry and not the individual worker should bear the burden of injuries suffered under its coverage. Mor, Inc. v. Haverlock, 566 P.2d 219,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 268

(Wyo. 1977).

Worker's compensation laws are to be interpreted and applied with reasonable liberality so that the purposes for which the law was enacted may be accomplished, and, where possible, the industry and not the individual should bear the burdens of accidents suffered. Jim's Water Serv. v. Eayrs, 590 P.2d 1346,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 376

(Wyo. 1979), limited, State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div. v. Halstead, 795 P.2d 760,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 1990).

The 1994 amendment to the statute, which rejected the rule of liberal construction, did not apply to a case involving a claim for benefits arising from an injury which occurred in 1989. Collicott v. State ex rel. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. (In re Collicott), 2001 WY 35, 20 P.3d 1077,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2001).

Question as to constitutionality of worker's compensation statute

could only be appropriately considered through declaratory judgment action, pursuant to W.R.A.P. 12.12. Shryack v. Carr Constr. Co., 3 P.3d 850,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 2000).

Court will not disregard principles of appellate practice inso doing. —

The Workmen's (now Worker's) Compensation Law will be liberally construed, but the supreme court will not disregard principles of appellate practice in so doing. In re Corey, 65 Wyo. 301, 200 P.2d 333,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1948).

And rule should not be extended for benefit of counsel in providingattorney's fees. —

That the Workmen's (now Worker's) Compensation Law should be construed liberally in favor of the workman is a holding clearly for the benefit of the workman and should not be extended for the benefit of counsel in providing attorney's fees, unless such allowance can be related directly to the benefit of the workman. Williams v. Northern Dev. Co., 425 P.2d 594,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 1967).

But no authority to extend law to injuries not within legislativelanguage. —

The supreme court is not free under the guise of liberal construction to extend the beneficial purposes of the compensation law to injuries that do not reasonably fall within the language employed by the legislature. Mor, Inc. v. Haverlock, 566 P.2d 219,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 268

(Wyo. 1977).

In the usual workmen's compensation case, the law should be liberally construed in favor of an award. However, such a policy does not give the supreme court carte blanche authority to ignore clear statutory provisions and under the guise of construction extend the beneficent purpose of the law to a disease or injury that does not fall reasonably within the reach of legislative language. Olson v. Federal Am. Partners, 567 P.2d 710,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 312

(Wyo. 1977).

Under the guise of liberal construction, the court cannot extend the beneficient purpose of compensation law to injuries which do not reasonably fall within the language of the statute. Deloges v. State, 750 P.2d 1329,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 1988).

No jurisdiction by Mississippi court. —

Under the correct application of Wyoming law, which the Mississippi court acknowledged was applicable, it did not have subject matter jurisdiction over plaintiff's claim for benefits under the Routh v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div., 952 P.2d 1108,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1998), reh'g denied,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. Feb. 17, 1998), cert. denied, 525 U.S. 814, 119 S. Ct. 49, 142 L. Ed. 2d 38, 1998 U.S. LEXIS 4815 (U.S. 1998).

Termination for inability to work not violative of public policy.—

Although it is violative of public policy to discharge an employee for exercising his rights under this chapter, there is a distinction between a termination for the exercise by the worker of his rights and a termination for the inability to do the work, even if such inability is caused by an accident requiring the exercise of worker's compensation rights. Lankford v. True Ranches, 822 P.2d 868,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 194

(Wyo. 1991).

Trial court is not required to invoke inferences favorable to claimant

in order to fill in the gaps in the proof designed to establish his entitlement to compensation. The rule in assessing the sufficiency of the evidence is that favorable inferences are drawn only from the prevailing party's evidence. Nickerson v. State, 740 P.2d 399,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 482

(Wyo. 1987).

Rule of liberality is not to be related to the evidence offered.

Olson v. Federal Am. Partners, 567 P.2d 710,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 312

(Wyo. 1977).

Burden of proof. —

The Worker's Compensation Act is liberally construed in favor of the employee, but the burden is on the claimant to prove the facts required for claim allowance, and the decision of the trial court will be sustained if supported by substantial evidence. Hampton v. All Field Serv., 726 P.2d 98,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 622

(Wyo. 1986).

The Worker's Compensation Act should be liberally construed in favor of the workman when possible, but, nevertheless, the workman has the burden of proof of the injury of compensability, and the trial court's compensation decision will be sustained if supported by substantial evidence. Tate v. Colling Prod. Serv., 726 P.2d 100,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 620

(Wyo. 1986).

As a result of societal factors motivating the electorate to adopt art. 10, § 4, Wyo. Const., and the legislature to provide comprehensive legislation, there has been invoked a basic tenet that the Worker's Compensation Law must be construed with reasonable liberality to protect persons suffering casualties in industry and to avoid incongruous results. However the employee must prove all of the essential facts required for claim allowance and the decision of the trial court will be sustained if supported by substantial evidence. Flint Eng'g & Constr. Co. v. Richardson, 726 P.2d 511,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 624

(Wyo. 1986).

Equitable estoppel. —

Equitable estoppel arises and is permitted under the Worker's Compensation Act; the language eliminating the liberal construction rule and mandating the quick and efficient delivery of benefits in § 27-14-101(b) does not operate to change the application of equitable estoppel under the Appleby v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2002 WY 84, 47 P.3d 613,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 2002).

Prima facie case of retaliatory discharge not established.—

An employee failed to meet her evidentiary burden in establishing a prima facie case of retaliatory discharge because the mere proximity between the filing of her worker's compensation claim and her subsequent discharge was not persuasive in light of evidence advanced by the employer of claim-preceding periods of permitted leave, effects to accommodate for physical problems, and the employee's inability to perform her assignments. Cardwell v. American Linen Supply, 843 P.2d 596,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 1992).

No unreasonable classification. —

The Workmen's (now Worker's) Compensation Act is not based on unreasonable classification. Ideal Bakery v. Schryver, 43 Wyo. 108, 299 P. 284,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(1931), citing art. 1, § 34, Wyo. Const.

Limited liability accident insurance. —

Workmen's (now Worker's) Compensation Act was not intended to give compensation as damages, but is in nature of accident insurance, a compromise between employers and employees, whereby in exchange for limited liability employer pays some claims where in the past no liability existed. Fuhs v. Swenson, 58 Wyo. 293, 131 P.2d 333,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1942).

The Wyoming Compensation Act is in the nature of accident insurance and is not intended to give compensation as damages. Markle v. Williamson, 518 P.2d 621,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 1974).

Legislature is proper source of all changes in the Workmen's (now Worker's) Compensation Law

and not the courts. Christensen v. Sikora, 57 Wyo. 57, 112 P.2d 557,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(1941).

And it has the power to attach conditions to the payments

to be made under the Workmen's (now Worker's) Compensation Law of this state even though a condition affects an amount recovered from a third party. Brown v. State, 79 Wyo. 355, 334 P.2d 502,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1959).

Temporary absence from state. —

Act held applicable to injuries to workmen employed in the state while temporarily out of its limits. Baldwin v. Byrne, 53 Wyo. 519, 86 P.2d 1095,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(1939).

Provisions in force at time of injury govern.

State ex rel. Director, Worker's Compensation Div. v. Tallman, 589 P.2d 835,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 346

(Wyo. 1979).

When cause of action begins. —

In a worker's compensation case, a “cause of action” exists in favor of an employee at the time he receives an injury arising out of an industrial accident occurring during the course of his employment. State ex rel. Director, Worker's Compensation Div. v. Tallman, 589 P.2d 835,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 346

(Wyo. 1979).

Injuries within scope of employment are compensable. —

Trial court erred when it affirmed a decision denying workers' compensation benefits after an employer refused to reimburse its injured employee for travel expenses after the employee had been injured in a car accident where the trip to deliver a truck belonging to the employer, a truck driving school, was clearly within the scope of employment and it was obvious that the denial of reimbursement for the return trip was solely motivated by the employer's desire to exclude the employee from receiving worker's compensation benefits. Lloyd v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Compensation Div., 2004 WY 85, 93 P.3d 1001,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 110

(Wyo. 2004).

Previously existing condition. —

Repair of claimants preexisting arteriovenous malformation was not compensable under the Wyoming Workers' Compensation Act. Haynes v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Comp. Div., 962 P.2d 876,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. 1998).

Applied

in

SOS Staffing Servs., Inc. v. Fields, 2002 WY 141,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 154

, 54 P.3d 761 (Wyo. 2002); Ball v. State Ex Rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2010 WY 128, 239 P.3d 621,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Sept. 22, 2010).

Quoted

in

Painter v. State ex rel. Wyoming Worker's Compensation Div., 931 P.2d 953,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1997), overruled on other grounds, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998); Carson v. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2014 WY 42,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Mar 31, 2014); Hildebrant v. State ex rel. Dep't of Workforce Servs., 2015 WY 41,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Mar. 24, 2015).

Stated

in

Casper Oil Co. v. Evenson, 888 P.2d 221,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1995).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Comp. Div. v. Gerdes, 951 P.2d 1170,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1997); Medical Commission. French v. Amax Coal West, 960 P.2d 1023,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1998); Moller v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 12 P.3d 702,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 211

(Wyo. 2000); Stuarte v. Colorado Interstate Gas Co., 130 F. Supp. 2d 1263, 2001 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 551 (D. Wyo. 2001); Merrill v. Jansma, 2004 WY 26, 86 P.3d 270,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(2004); Torres v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2005 WY 7, 105 P.3d 101,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(2005); In re Worker's Compensation Claim v. State Ex Rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Compensation Div., 2006 WY 65, 135 P.3d 568,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. May 31, 2006).

Law reviews. —

For note on 50 years of workmen's compensation, see 16 Wyo. L.J. 26 (1961).

For comment on Markle v. Williamson, 518 P.2d 621,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 1974), see X Land & Water L. Rev. 263 (1975).

For article, “The Wyoming Uninsured Motorist Act: A Regulatory Reconciliation of Mandated Coverages with the Standard Uninsured Motorist Endorsement,” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 213 (1976).

For note, “Fixing Liability in Occupational Disease Cases,” see XIII Land & Water L. Rev. 1051 (1978).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Insurance carrier's liability for part of employer's liability attributable to violation of law or other misconduct on his part, 1 ALR2d 407.

Application for, or award, denial or acceptance of, compensation under state workmen's compensation act as precluding action under Federal Employers' Liability Act by one engaged in interstate commerce within that act, 6 ALR2d 581.

Voluntary payment of compensation under statute of one state as bar to claim, or ground for reduction of claim, of compensation under statute of another state, 8 ALR2d 628.

Waiver and estoppel in regard to insurer's denial of renewal of policy, 85 ALR2d 1410.

Application for, or receipt of, unemployment compensation benefits as affecting claim for workmen's compensation, 96 ALR2d 941.

Handling, preparing, presenting or trying workmen's compensation claims or cases as practice of law, 2 ALR3d 724.

Provision for indemnifying insurer against, or reimbursing it for, liability which it may incur to persons injured in policy under workmen's compensation act, 29 ALR3d 291.

Insured's receipt of or right to workmen's compensation benefits as affecting recovery under accident, hospital or medical expense policy, 40 ALR3d 1012.

Homeowners' or personal liability insurance as providing coverage for liability under workmen's compensation laws, 41 ALR3d 1306.

Mental disorders as compensable under workmen's compensation acts, 97 ALR3d 161.

Modern status of effect of state workmen's compensation act on right of third-person tortfeasor to contribution or indemnity from employer of injured or killed workman, 100 ALR3d 350.

Industrial accidents involving conveyor belts or systems, 2 ALR4th 262.

Recovery for discharge from employment in retaliation for filing workers' compensation claim, 32 ALR4th 1221.

Liability of employer, supervisor or manager for intentionally or recklessly causing employee emotional distress, 52 ALR4th 853.

Workers' compensation: effect of allegation that injury was caused by, or occurred during course of, worker's illegal conduct, 73 ALR4th 270.

Workers' compensation: compensability of injuries incurred traveling to or from medical treatment of earlier compensable injury, 83 ALR4th 110.

Presumption or inference that accidental death of employee engaged in occupation of manufacturing or processing arose out of and in course of employment, 47 ALR5th 801.

Handling, preparing, presenting, or trying workers' compensation claims or cases as practice of law, 58 ALR5th 449.

Workers' compensation: availability, rate, or method of calculation of interest on attorney's fees or penalties, 79 ALR5th 201.

Right to workers' compensation for emotional distress or like injury suffered by claimant as a result of sudden emotional stimuli involving personnel action, 82 ALR5th 149.

Library References.

Larson's Workers' Compensation Law § 130.08D (Matthew Bender).